Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Amendment of Articles of Incorporation

271B.10-010.
Authority to amend — Conversion to nonstock, nonprofit corporation.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation or to delete a provision not required in the articles of incorporation. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation shall be determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

A shareholder of the corporation shall not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles of incorporation, including provisions relating to management, control, capital structure, dividend entitlement, or purpose or duration of the corporation.

A corporation existing under this chapter or its predecessors may amend its articles of incorporation to convert into a nonstock, nonprofit corporation under KRS

273.161

to

273.387

, but a corporation existing under KRS

273.161

to

273.387

may not convert to a corporation existing under this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 103, effective January 1, 1989; 2005, ch. 182, § 8, effective June 20, 2005.

271B.10-020.
Amendment by board of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a corporation’s board of directors may adopt one (1) or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation without shareholder action:

To extend the duration of the corporation if it was incorporated at a time when limited duration was required by law;

To delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

To delete the name and address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file with the Secretary of State;

To delete the mailing address of the corporation’s initial principal office if the statement containing the mailing address of new principal office is on file with the Secretary of State;

To change each issued and unissued authorized share of an outstanding class into a greater number of whole shares if the corporation has only shares of that class outstanding;

To change the corporate name by substituting the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company,” “limited,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.,” or “ltd.,” for a similar word or abbreviation in the name, or by adding, deleting, or changing a geographical attribution for the name; or

To make any other change expressly permitted by this chapter to be made without shareholder action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 104, effective January 1, 1989; 1998, ch. 341, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

271B.10-030.
Amendment by board of directors and shareholders.

A corporation’s board of directors may propose one (1) or more amendments to the articles of incorporation for submission to the shareholders.

For the amendment to be adopted:

The board of directors shall recommend the amendment to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders with the amendment; and

The shareholders entitled to vote on the amendment shall approve the amendment as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed amendment on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholder’s meeting in accordance with KRS

271B.7-050

. The notice of meeting shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed amendment and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment.

Unless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the board of directors (acting pursuant to subsection (3) of this section) requires a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the amendment to be adopted shall be approved by:

A majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment by any voting group with respect to which the amendment would create dissenters’ rights; and

The votes required by KRS

271B.7-250

and

271B.7-260

by every other voting group entitled to vote on the amendment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 105, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.10-040.
Voting on amendments by voting groups.

The holders of the outstanding shares of a class shall be entitled to vote as a separate voting group (if shareholder voting is otherwise required by this chapter) on a proposed amendment if the amendment would:

Increase or decrease the aggregate number of authorized shares of the class;

Effect an exchange or reclassification of all or part of the shares of the class into shares of another class;

Effect an exchange or reclassification, or create the right of exchange, of all or part of the shares of another class into shares of the class;

Change the designation, rights, preferences, or limitations of all or part of the shares of the class;

Change the shares of all or part of the class into a different number of shares of the same class;

Create a new class of shares having rights or preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution that are prior, superior, or substantially equal to the shares of the class;

Increase the rights, preferences, or number of authorized shares of any class that, after giving effect to the amendment, have rights or preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution that are prior, superior, or substantially equal to the shares of the class;

Limit or deny an existing preemptive right of all or part of the shares of the class; or

Cancel or otherwise affect rights to distributions or dividends that have accumulated but not yet been declared on all or part of the shares of the class.

If a proposed amendment would affect a series of a class of shares in one (1) or more of the ways described in subsection (1) of this section, the shares of that series shall be entitled to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed amendment.

If a proposed amendment that entitles two (2) or more series of shares to vote as separate voting groups under this section would affect those two (2) or more series in the same or a substantially similar way, the shares of all the series so affected shall vote together as a single voting group on the proposed amendment.

A class or series of shares is entitled to the voting rights granted by this section although the articles of incorporation provide that the shares are nonvoting shares.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 106, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.10-050.
Amendment before issuance of shares.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares, its incorporators or board of directors may adopt one (1) or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 107, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.10-060.
Articles of amendment.

A corporation amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment adopted;

If an amendment provides for an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of issued shares, provisions for implementing the amendment if not contained in the amendment itself;

The date of each amendment’s adoption;

If an amendment was adopted by the incorporators or board of directors without shareholder action, a statement to that effect and that shareholder action was not required; and

If an amendment was approved by the shareholders:

The designation, number of outstanding shares, number of votes entitled to be cast by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the amendment, and number of votes of each voting group indisputably represented at the meeting; and

Either the total number of votes cast for and against the amendment by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the amendment or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the amendment by each voting group and a statement that the number cast for the amendment by each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group.

If the amendment includes language converting the corporation into a nonprofit, nonstock corporation under KRS

273.161

to

273.387

, the conversion shall be effective upon the filing of the amendment with the Secretary of State, and, upon filing, the Secretary of State shall immediately forward a copy of the amendment to the commissioner of revenue.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 108, effective January 1, 1989; 2005, ch. 182, § 9, effective June 20, 2005.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11, 85, 95, 97, 98, 99, 123, and 181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in the 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

271B.10-070.
Restated articles of incorporation.

A corporation’s board of directors may restate its articles of incorporation at any time with or without shareholder action.

The restatement may include one (1) or more amendments to the articles. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring shareholder approval, it shall be adopted as provided in KRS

271B.10-030

.

If the board of directors submits a restatement for shareholder action, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders’ meeting in accordance with KRS

271B.7-050

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the articles.

A corporation restating its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of restatement setting forth the name of the corporation and the text of the restated articles of incorporation together with a certificate setting forth:

Whether the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring shareholder approval and, if it does not, that the board of directors adopted the restatement; or

If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring shareholder approval, the information required by KRS

271B.10-060

.

Restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments to them when the restated articles of incorporation become effective pursuant to KRS

14A.2-070

.

The secretary of state may certify restated articles of incorporation as the articles of incorporation currently in effect, without including the certificate information required by subsection (4) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 109, effective January 1, 1989; 2010, ch. 151, § 132, effective January 1, 2011.

271B.10-080.
Amendment pursuant to reorganization.

A corporation’s articles of incorporation may be amended without action by the board of directors or shareholders to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under federal statute if the articles of incorporation after amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by KRS

271B.2-020

.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

The date of the court’s order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

Shareholders of a corporation undergoing reorganization shall not have dissenters’ rights except as and to the extent provided in the reorganization plan.

This section shall not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 110, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.10-090.
Effect of amendment.

An amendment to articles of incorporation shall not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than shareholders of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation’s name shall not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 111, effective January 1, 1989.